Hawaii statutes.
§321-62 General duties of department.
The department of health shall study and appraise the State's dental health
needs and resources, and shall foster the development and expansion of dental
health services to the people of the State. The department may:

(1) Conduct research, investigations, experiments,
demonstrations, and studies relating to the incidence, causes, diagnosis,
treatment, and prevention of dental diseases;

(2) Supervise, provide, and direct clinical dental
health services for adults and children in the State;

(3) Develop and conduct a program of dental health
education of the public;

(4) Provide information and education relating to
dental health to public health nurses, teachers, social workers, and others who
deal in a professional capacity with the public, through publications,
seminars, institutes, and other appropriate means; and

(5) Provide training for professional personnel to
staff state and local dental health programs. [L 1949, c 208, §5; RL 1955,
§46-53; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §321-62; am L 1992, c 70, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next